Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 2. Oil and Gas

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2008, ch. 28, § 2, provides:

“(a)
The department shall report to the governor and the joint revenue interim committee on the results of applying the modified netback valuation method as provided by this act.
The report shall be submitted not later than October 1 of each year beginning in 2009 through 2019.
The report shall, subject to confidentiality restrictions imposed by law:

“(i)
Describe whether producer-processors paid taxes using the modified netback method or the proportionate profits method;

“(ii)
Include a table showing taxable value per mcf under the modified netback, proportionate profits, comparable value and any other natural gas valuation methods employed;

“(iii)
Present a summary of all proceedings pending before, or decisions made by, the state board of equalization or any Wyoming court pertaining to producer-processed natural gas; and

“(iv)
Provide a listing of any taxes paid under protest by a producer-processor, specifying the amounts and the county or counties involved.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

71 Am. Jur. 2d State and Local Taxation §§ 155 to 157.

§ 39-14-201.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Arm’s-length market or sales price” means the transaction price determined in connection with a bona fide arm’s length sale;

“Bona fide arm’s-length sale” means a transaction in cash or terms equivalent to cash for specified property rights after reasonable exposure in a competitive market between a willing, well informed and prudent buyer and seller with adverse economic interests and assuming neither party is acting under undue compulsion or duress;

“Average daily production” means the qualified maximum total production of domestic crude oil produced from wells reported as oil wells to the Wyoming oil and gas commission during the preceding calendar year divided by the number of calendar days in that year times the number of wells which produced and wells which injected substances for the recovery of crude petroleum from that property or lease in that year. To qualify as maximum total production each well must have been maintained at the maximum feasible rate of production in accordance with recognized conservation practices and not significantly curtailed by reason of mechanical failure or other disruption in production;

“Collection wells” means reservoir access holes drilled from underground shafts or tunnels from which crude oil or natural gas is produced;

“Compressor” means a device associated with processing or transporting natural gas which mechanically increases the pressure of natural gas;

“Crude oil” means the crude petroleum oil and any other hydrocarbons, regardless of gravity, produced at the well in liquid form by ordinary production methods and which are not the result of condensation of gas before or after it leaves the reservoir;

“Dehydrator” means a device which removes water vapor that is commonly associated with raw natural gas;

“Department review” means, but is not limited to, corrections of clerical errors or reconciliations of tax reports with reports required by other state or federal agencies;

“Gathering” means the transportation of crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas from multiple wells by separate and individual pipelines to a central point of accumulation, dehydration, compression, separation, heating and treating or storage;

“Heating and treating” means the removal of solid, liquid and gaseous components from the well stream by chemical, mechanical and thermal processes;

“Lease” means the area encompassed in the leasehold granting the right to explore for or produce crude oil or natural gas, which may include a single tract or multiple tracts of land described in the instrument granting the leasehold;

“Lease automatic custody transfer unit (LACT)” means a device which automatically and mechanically measures and at which point custody of crude oil transfers from the producer to the purchaser;

“Lease condensate” means liquid hydrocarbons which are separated from other components of the natural gas production stream on the lease or before the inlet to a natural gas processing facility;

“Mine product valuation amendment” means a valuation adjustment determination made by the department including special directives;

“Natural gas” means all gases, both hydrocarbon and nonhydrocarbon, that occur naturally beneath the earth’s crust and are produced from an oil or gas well. For the purposes of taxation, the term natural gas includes:

Products separated for sale or distribution during processing of the natural gas stream including, but not limited to plant condensate, natural gas liquids and sulfur;

Natural gas that is consumed on the site where the natural gas is produced for any purpose except for those specified in W.S. 39-14-205(j) and (m).

“Purchaser” means the first purchaser who acquires the produced crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas from the taxpayer for value;

“Previously shut-in well” means a well from which crude oil previously has been produced and from which no production has occurred for at least the two (2) consecutive years prior to January 1, 1995;

“Processing” means any activity occurring beyond the inlet to a natural gas processing facility that changes the well stream’s physical or chemical characteristics, enhances the marketability of the stream, or enhances the value of the separate components of the stream. Processing includes, but is not limited to fractionation, absorption, adsorption, flashing, refrigeration, cryogenics, sweetening, dehydration within a processing facility, beneficiation, stabilizing, compression (other than production compression such as reinjection, wellhead pressure regulation or the changing of pressures and temperatures in a reservoir) and separation which occurs within a processing facility;

“Property” means lease or unit. The term “property” is synonymous with the term “mining claim”;

“Recompletion” means any downhole operation that is conducted to establish production of an oil or gas well in any geological interval not currently completed or producing which has been approved as a recompletion by the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission;

“Reservoir” means an underground accumulation of oil or gas or both characterized by a single pressure system which is segregated from other such accumulations;

“Separating” means the isolation of the well stream into discrete gas, liquid hydrocarbons, liquid water and solid components;

“Severance tax” means an excise tax imposed on the present and continuing privilege of removing, extracting, severing or producing any mineral in this state;

“Stripper production” means the production from a property or lease whose average daily production of crude petroleum from wells reported as oil wells to the Wyoming oil and gas commission did not exceed:

Ten (10) barrels per day per well during the preceding calendar year if the average price received by the producer for production from the property was twenty dollars ($20.00) or more per barrel; or

Fifteen (15) barrels per day per well during the preceding calendar year if the average price received by the producer for production from the property was less than twenty dollars ($20.00) per barrel.

“Sweetening” means any activity that removes acid gases, such as hydrogen sulfide and carbon dioxide, from the well stream. Sweetening includes, but is not limited to absorption, stabilization, thermal and catalytic conversions, chemical reaction and regeneration;

“Tertiary production” means the crude oil recovered from a petroleum reservoir by means of a tertiary enhanced recovery project to which one (1) or more tertiary enhanced recovery techniques meeting the certification requirements of the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission or the United States government are being applied;

“Unit” means the total area incorporated in a unitization agreement providing for a consolidated development and operational plan to recover oil or gas from the lease areas incorporated in the unit. Participating areas of units as designated by the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission may be designated as separate units for production tax purposes;

“Unreported production” means production volume for which no tax report was filed for the reporting period by the taxpayer or his agent;

“Value of the gross product” means fair market value as prescribed by W.S. 39-14-203(b), less any deductions and exemption allowed by Wyoming law or rules;

“Well” means a hole drilled in the earth for the purpose of finding or producing crude oil or natural gas;

“Wildcat well” means any crude oil or natural gas well designated as a wildcat well by the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission. The Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission shall adopt rules and criteria to implement this designation process. The rules and criteria shall provide that wildcat wells are wells outside known fields or new wells which are determined by the commission to have discovered crude oil or natural gas in a pool not previously proven productive;

“Workover” means any downhole operation that is designed to sustain, restore or increase the production rate or the ultimate recovery in the geologic interval in which an oil or gas well or group of wells is currently completed and producing and approved as a workover by the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission;

For the purposes of W.S. 39-14-203(b)(vi)(E), “rate of return” means the weighted average cost of capital (hereafter referred to as the “capitalization rate”) as calculated under this paragraph for the ten (10) largest natural gas producers in this state on a production volume basis during the preceding production year for which the appropriate data is publicly available (hereafter referred to as the “representative companies”). The following shall apply:

The capitalization rate is any rate used to convert an income stream into a present worth of future benefits. The rate reflects the relationship between one (1) year’s income or an annual average of several years’ income and the corresponding value. The department shall annually calculate the capitalization rate based upon the band of investment method as defined by this paragraph. The primary components of the capitalization rate shall include capital structure and cost of capital (debt, preferred and equity capital) as developed in appropriate money markets for the representative companies;

“Band of investment method” means that the capitalization rate is equal to the weighted average cost of the debt and equity portions of the capital investment. The following shall apply:

Proper development and application of the band of investment shall require obtaining and analyzing data for the percent of debt and equity which makes up the capital structure as determined from published financial sources such as Moody’s bond record, Moody’s bond survey, Value Line, Moody’s public utility or transportation manuals, regulatory reports or other recognized financial materials. The determination shall be done by the corporate bonds’ rating of the representative companies or other means if bond ratings are not available;

Debt rate estimates used in the band of investment method shall reflect the average current cost of yield to maturity of outstanding issues of debt financing for the year ending closest to the date of the calculation of the capitalization rate required by this paragraph. The rates shall be taken from published financial sources such as Moody’s public utility news reports or other recognized financial materials. The determination shall be done by corporate bond rating of the representative companies;

Preferred rate estimates used in the band of investment method shall reflect the average current cost of market yield of outstanding issues of preferred stock financing for the year ending closest to the date of the calculation of the capitalization rate required by this paragraph. The rates shall be taken from published financial sources such as Moody’s public utility news reports or other recognized financial materials. The determination shall be done by corporate bond rating of the representative companies;

The current cost of equity shall be based on data from the capital markets of the representative companies. Equity rates shall reflect the representative cost of equity financing for the representative companies by corporate bond rating as of the date of the calculation of the capitalization rate under this paragraph. The current cost of equity shall be developed by accepted models in the appraisal and financial communities. These models shall include, but are not limited to, equity risk premium, capital asset pricing model and the discounted cash flow model. The sources of required data shall be taken from published financial sources such as Value Line, Ibbotson Associates, Wall Street Journal, regulatory filings and other recognized financial materials. Not later than March 15 of each year, the department shall conduct a public meeting for presentation of the capitalization rate to be used to value production in the same calendar year in which the rate is determined. Notice of the date and time of the meeting shall be provided to all interested parties at least thirty (30) days prior to the meeting. Interested parties may present written or oral comments on the proposed capitalization rate or within five (5) business days thereafter. A final determination of the capitalization rate shall be made available on or before March 31 or as soon thereafter as possible;

Within thirty (30) days of the final capitalization rate determination under this paragraph, the taxpayer shall file amended returns and remit any severance tax due for that portion of the year for which the capitalization rate had yet to be determined and no interest or penalty shall be due as a result of the application of the new capitalization rate.

For the purposes of W.S. 39-14-203(b)(vi)(E), “return on investment” means the product of the rate of return multiplied by the gross capital investment in all processing and transportation facilities used by the taxpayer to process or transport natural gas from the point of valuation to the point of arms-length sale as maintained on the taxpayer’s books and records under generally accepted accounting principles;

For the purposes of W.S. 39-14-203(b)(vi)(E), “total direct processing and transportation costs” means all costs incurred by the taxpayer to operate all processing or transportation facilities from the point of valuation to the point of arms-length sale as maintained on the taxpayer’s books and records. The costs shall include salaries and benefits; contract labor; repairs and maintenance including processing facility turnarounds; fuel, power and utilities; chemicals; processing facility premise lease costs to nonaffiliated parties; waste water treatment; disposal of byproduct and waste products; safety; costs of environmental permitting and monitoring, federal and state environmental compliance fees and costs, excluding compensatory and punitive damages and governmental penalties; laboratory; distributive control system; and ad valorem taxes on real and tangible personal property excluding the gross products tax. The taxpayer shall be entitled to its proportionate share of the total direct processing and transportation costs as measured by its percentage of inlet volumes;

For the purposes of paragraph (xxxiv) of this subsection, “gross capital investment” means the total gross capitalized investment in the processing and transportation facilities from the point of valuation to the point of arms-length sale as maintained on the taxpayer’s books and records under generally accepted accounting principles. The gross capital investment shall be calculated based on the company’s books and records as of January 1 plus December 31 of the production year, divided by two (2). For purposes of this paragraph, gross capital investment shall not include any investment in equipment that is considered permanently abandoned under generally accepted accounting principles. Gross capital investment shall include items which are not in continuous operation if they remain on the company’s books and records under generally accepted accounting principles;

“Qualifying well” means a well in which:

A well site is already connected to a pipeline, pipeline capacity is unavailable on the existing pipeline and the producer and the pipeline operator jointly have filed an application with the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission attesting to the lack of existing pipeline takeaway capacity;

A producer’s well is not connected to an existing pipeline but the producer’s lands, leases, wells or gas are contractually dedicated to a pipeline operator and the producer and the pipeline operator to which the lands, leases, well, or gas are dedicated jointly have filed an application with the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission attesting that it is either technically or commercially unfeasible to connect a pipeline to the producer’s well; or

A producer’s well is not already connected to an existing pipeline and the producer’s lands, leases, wells or gas are not contractually dedicated but the producer unilaterally has filed an application with the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission attesting to these facts.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 10, § 1; ch. 59, § 1; 2008, ch. 28, § 1; 2021 ch. 156, § 1, effective January 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to authorization for excise tax on severing or extracting minerals, see art. 15, § 19, Wyo. Const.

As to the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund, see §

9-4-204

.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, inserted present (a)(xxxiii) through (a)(xxxvi).

The 2021 amendment

, effective January 1, 2022, added the (a)(xv)(A) designation; added (a)(xv)(B) and made related changes; and added (a)(xxxvii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears on the printed act.

Laws 2008, ch. 28, § 3, provides: “This act shall apply to all natural gas production occurring on and after January 1, 2009.”

Applied

in

Lance Oil & Gas Co. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2004 WY 156, 101 P.3d 899,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 201

(2004).

Quoted

in

EOG Res., Inc. v. Dep't of Revenue, 2004 WY 35, 86 P.3d 1280,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(2004).

§ 39-14-202.
Administration; confidentiality.

Administration. The following shall apply:

The department shall annually value and assess crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas production at its fair market value for taxation;

Based upon the information received or procured pursuant to W.S. 39-14-207(a) or 39-14-208(a), the department shall annually value crude oil, lease condensate and natural gas for the preceding calendar year in appropriate unit measures at the fair market value of the product, after the mining or production process is completed;

Annually, on or before June 1, or as soon thereafter as the fair market value is determined, the department shall certify the valuation determined by the department to the county assessor of the county from which the crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas was produced to be entered upon the assessment rolls of the county;

through (viii) Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 207.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 207.

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 68, § 1.

Confidentiality. The following shall apply:

All taxpayer returns and return information shall be confidential and, except as authorized below, no current or former official, officer, employee or agent of the state of Wyoming or any political subdivision thereof shall disclose any such information obtained by him in connection with his service as an officer or employee;

As used in this subsection, taxpayer returns and return information shall include, but not be limited to, all statements, reports, summaries and all other data and documents under audit or provided by the taxpayer in accordance with the provisions of W.S. 39-14-207(a) and related provision;

Without written authorization from the taxpayer, no current or former official, officer, employee or agent of the state of Wyoming or any political subdivision thereof shall release taxpayer returns and return information pertaining to taxes imposed by this article, except:

Information may be released to the governor or his designee, members of the board, to employees of the department of audit, the department of revenue, the consensus revenue estimating group and to the attorney general;

Upon prior notice to the taxpayer, information may be released by the department, upon written application, to any other governmental entity if the governmental entity shows sufficient reason to obtain the information for official business;

Information is admissible in court or administrative proceedings related to mineral taxes or government royalties.

Any person receiving information pursuant to subparagraph (iii)(B) of this subsection shall sign an agreement with the department to keep the information confidential;

Units of production reported by the taxpayer and the taxpayer’s taxable value are not confidential and may be released without qualification;

Any person who negligently violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00). Any person who intentionally violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), but not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) and imprisoned for not more than one (1) year.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 6, § 3; 1999, ch. 10, § 1; 2000, ch. 68, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 2; 2009, ch. 168, § 207.

The 2008 amendment,

repealed former (a)(ix), pertaining to various reporting requirements to the legislature and legislative committees.

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, repealed (a)(iv), which enumerated the members of the gas research review committee; repealed (a)(v), which dealt with the state oil and gas supervisor's membership in that committee; repealed (a)(vi), which outlined the committee's responsibilities; repealed (a)(vii), which detailed the terms and conditions for committee certification of research projects; repealed (a)(viii), which dealt with the committee's annual reports to the governor; and repealed (a)(x), which read: “Paragraphs (iv) through (ix) of this subsection and this paragraph are not effective after June 30, 1999, unless specifically extended by the legislature.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 3, effective July 1, 1998, amended paragraph (a)(iii) of W.S. 39-6-310, which was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. The amendment to § 39-6-310(a)(iii) by ch. 6 was subsequently incorporated into this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Production and post-production expenses for tax purposes. —

The processes necessary for production of gas, for severance and ad valorem tax purposes, are those necessary to sever or remove the gas from the well and those processes which are not necessary to remove the gas from the well are post-production expenses. This includes compression which is not necessary to remove gas from the well. Chevron U.S.A. v. State, 918 P.2d 980,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 1996), reh'g denied,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. July 16, 1996).

Ad valorem tax reimbursements are part of fair cash market value

of natural gas for severance tax purposes. Enron Oil & Gas Co. v. Department of Revenue & Taxation, 820 P.2d 977,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 1991) (decided under prior version of statutory provisions).

Interest assessed from date tax delinquent. —

When a taxpayer undervalues its oil and gas gross production, the underpaid ad valorem tax is delinquent on the date it should have been paid, not on the later date of notification and demand. Assessing interest only from the date of notification and demand would permit the taxpayer to undervalue gross production without risk of penalty and would allow the taxpayer the free use of the unpaid tax dollars. Kunard v. Enron Oil & Gas Co., 869 P.2d 132,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1994).

Administrative due process rights violated. —

In a contested case proceeding, the State Board of Equalization violated the natural gas processing and production company's procedural due process rights in an administrative proceeding by depriving the company of an opportunity to participate. The board remanded the case to the department of revenue for adoption of a more determinative formula for computation of comparable value based upon reasonable inferences from third-party natural gas processing fees without allowing the company to participate. Because the formula depended upon factual ascertainment in order to properly compute those taxes, the nonparticipating company was deprived of its due process rights. Amoco Prod. Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 882 P.2d 866,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1994).

Powers and duties of oil and gas commission. —

The department of revenue, acting through the state board of equalization, is vested with pervasive and sole authority over all aspects of the taxation of Wyoming citizens and business entities, including the construction of any statute affecting the assessment, levying, and collection of taxes; the oil and gas commission is empowered to adopt rules and regulations and act administratively to prevent waste and encourage the conservation of Wyoming's oil and gas resources. Kerr-Mcgee Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 903 P.2d 537,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1995).

Commission may not base its decisions on tax matters. —

The oil and gas conservation commission must make its decisions and promulgate its orders by its discerning conclusions as to what will either prevent or remediate waste; the commission has no authority to base its decisions on tax matters. Kerr-Mcgee Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 903 P.2d 537,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1995).

Reporting of oil production should be done at wellhead. —

Wyoming Department of Revenue properly reallocated a production company's oil production from a production unit for 1980 through 1988 between one county and intervenor county because former Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-2-201(e) always contemplated that reporting of oil production should be done at the wellhead, and the enactment of former Wyo. Stat. Ann § 39-2-213 (currently Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-14-207(a)(iii)) did not constitute a ‘change,’ but only a restatement of what general practice had always been contemplated, the practice that was generally in place, and the practice that should generally continue. BP Am. Prod. Co. v. Dep't of Revenue, 2006 WY 27, 130 P.3d 438,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2006).

Cited

in

Bd. of County Comm'rs v. Exxon Mobil Corp. 2002 WY 151, 55 P.3d 714,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 2002).